Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-3528
Property taxable; paraplegic; multiple amputee; claim exemption.

Any veteran claiming the exemption as provided by section 77-3527 shall make application to the county assessor upon forms prescribed and furnished by the Tax Commissioner. Such application shall be made on or before June 30 of each year. Exemptions claimed before June 30 shall apply for the year such exemption is claimed.

Laws 1979, LB 65, § 28;

Laws 1995, LB 133, § 6;

Laws 1996, LB 1039, § 11;

Laws 1997, LB 397, § 33.